California statutes. Business and Professions Code
A license or approval that has expired may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration by filing an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If the license or approval is not renewed within 30 days after its expiration, the licensed physician assistant and approved supervising physician, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the prescribed delinquency fee, if any. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which all renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever occurs last. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the expiration date provided in Section 3522 or 3523 which next occurs after the effective date of the
 renewal, when it shall expire, if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 40.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3524.5.

(a) The board may require a licensee to complete continuing education as a condition of license renewal under Section 3523 or 3524. The board shall not require more than 50 hours of continuing education every two years. The board shall, as it deems appropriate, accept certification by the National Commission on Certification of Physician Assistants (NCCPA), or another qualified certifying body, as determined by the board, as evidence of compliance with continuing education requirements.

(b) (1) The board shall adopt regulations to require that, on and after January 1, 2022, all continuing education courses for licensees under this chapter contain curriculum that includes the understanding of implicit bias.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2023, continuing education providers shall ensure compliance with paragraph (1).

(3) Beginning January 1, 2023, the board shall audit continuing education providers at least once every five years to ensure adherence to regulatory requirements, and shall withhold or rescind approval from any provider that is in violation of the regulatory requirements.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (b), a continuing education course dedicated solely to research or other issues that does not include a direct patient care component is not required to contain curriculum that includes implicit bias in the practice of physician assistants.

(d) In order to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a), continuing education courses shall
 address at least one or a combination of the following:

(1) Examples of how implicit bias affects perceptions and treatment decisions of physician assistants, leading to disparities in health outcomes.

(2) Strategies to address how unintended biases in decisionmaking may contribute to health care disparities by shaping behavior and producing differences in medical treatment along lines of race, ethnicity, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, socioeconomic status, or other characteristics.

(e) (1) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in menopausal mental or physical health.

(2) In
 determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in maternal mental health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 836, Sec. 3.5.   (AB 2581)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3524.6.

A physician assistant who provides primary care to a patient population of which over 25 percent are 65 years of age or older shall complete at least 20 percent of all mandatory continuing education hours in a course in the field of geriatric medicine, the special care needs of patients with dementia, or the care of older patients.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 336, Sec. 3.   (SB 639)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3524.65.

Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 3524.5, beginning July 1, 2027, a physician assistant who provides care to a patient population composed of adult women under 65 years of age who completes one or more continuing education courses in perimenopause, menopause, or postmenopausal care shall receive two hours towards the requirement in Section 3524.5 for each hour of a completed course, not to exceed eight hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 5.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3524.7.

In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in infection-associated chronic conditions, including, but not limited to, long COVID, as defined by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, myalgic encephalomyelitis, and dysautonomia.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 433, Sec. 4.   (AB 3119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3525.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this chapter. However, such renewal does not entitle such holder, to practice or otherwise violate the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this chapter. If the license is reinstated after expiration, the license holder, as a condition to reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last preceding regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1448, Sec. 1.7.)
-------------------------------------------

3526.

A person who fails to renew their license or approval within five years after its expiration may not renew it, and it may not be reissued, reinstated, or restored after that time has elapsed, but that person may apply for and obtain a new license or approval if they:

(a) Have not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(b) Take and pass the examination, if any, that would be required of them if application for licensure was being made for the first time, or otherwise establishes to the satisfaction of the board that, with due regard for the public interest,
 they are qualified to practice as a physician assistant.

(c) Pay all of the fees that would be required as if application for licensure was being made for the first time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 18.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Denial, Suspension and Revocation [3527. - 3531.]

3527.

(a) The board may order the denial of an application for, or the issuance subject to terms and conditions of, or the suspension or revocation of, or the imposition of probationary conditions upon a PA license after a hearing as required in Section 3528 for unprofessional conduct that includes, but is not limited to, a violation of this chapter, a violation of the Medical Practice Act, or a violation of the regulations adopted by the board.

(b) The board may order the denial of an application for, or the suspension or revocation of, or the imposition of probationary conditions upon, an approved program after a hearing as required in Section 3528 for a violation of this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(c) The board may order the denial of an application for, or the suspension or revocation of, or the imposition of probationary conditions upon, a PA license, after a hearing as required in Section 3528 for unprofessional conduct that includes, except for good cause, the knowing failure of a licensee to protect patients by failing to follow infection control guidelines of the board, thereby risking transmission of bloodborne infectious diseases from licensee to patient, from patient to patient, and from patient to licensee. In administering this subdivision, the board shall consider referencing the standards, regulations, and guidelines of the State Department of Public Health developed pursuant to Section 1250.11 of the Health and Safety Code and the standards, regulations, and guidelines pursuant to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code) for preventing the
 transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, and other bloodborne pathogens in health care settings. As necessary, the board shall consult with the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the Podiatric Medical Board of California, the Dental Board of California, the Board of Registered Nursing, and the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California to encourage appropriate consistency in the implementation of this subdivision.

The board shall seek to ensure that licensees are informed of the responsibility of licensees and others to follow infection control guidelines, and of the most recent scientifically recognized safeguards for minimizing the risk of transmission of bloodborne infectious diseases.

(d) The board may order the licensee to pay the costs of monitoring the probationary conditions imposed on the license.

(e) The expiration, cancellation, forfeiture, or suspension of a PA license by operation of law or by order or decision of the board or a court of law, the placement of a license on a retired status, or the voluntary surrender of a license by a licensee shall not deprive the board of jurisdiction to commence or proceed with any investigation of, or action or disciplinary proceeding against, the licensee or to render a decision suspending or revoking the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 41.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3527.5.

(a) The board shall not suspend or revoke the license of a physician assistant solely for performing an abortion if the licensee performed the abortion in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code).

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, Sections 141, 480, 490, and 3527, the board shall not deny an application for licensure as a physician assistant, or suspend, revoke, or otherwise impose discipline upon a person licensed in this state as a physician assistant under either of the following circumstances:

(1) The person is licensed or certified to practice as a physician assistant in another state and was disciplined in that state solely for performing an abortion in that state.

(2) The person is licensed or certified to practice as a physician assistant in another state and was convicted in that state for an offense related solely to the performance of an abortion in that state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 178, Sec. 2.   (SB 385)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3528.

Any proceedings involving the denial, suspension, or revocation of the application for licensure or the license of a PA or the application for approval or the approval of an approved program under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 707, Sec. 13.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3529.

The board may hear any matters filed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 3527, or may assign the matter to a hearing officer. The Medical Board of California may hear any matters filed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 3527, or may assign the matter to a hearing officer. If a matter is heard by the board or the Medical Board of California, the hearing officer who presided at the hearing shall be present during the board’s or the Medical Board of California’s consideration of the case, and, if requested, assist and advise the board or the Medical Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 62.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3530.

(a) A person whose license or approval has been revoked or suspended, or who has been placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including modification or termination of probation, after a period of not less than the following minimum periods has elapsed from the effective date of the decision ordering that disciplinary action:

(1) At least three years for reinstatement of a license or approval revoked for unprofessional conduct, except that the board may, for good cause shown, specify in a revocation order that a petition for reinstatement may be filed after two years.

(2) At least two years for early termination of probation of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for modification of a condition, or reinstatement of a license or approval revoked for mental or physical illness, or termination of probation of less than three years.

(b) The petition shall state any facts as may be required by the board. The petition shall be accompanied by at least two verified recommendations from physicians licensed either by the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board who have personal knowledge of the activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary penalty was imposed.

(c) The petition may be heard by the board. The board may assign the petition to an administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code. After a hearing on the petition, the administrative law judge shall provide a proposed decision to the board that shall be
 acted upon in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(d) The board or the administrative law judge hearing the petition, may consider all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken, the offense for which the petitioner was disciplined, the petitioner’s activities during the time the license was in good standing, and the petitioner’s rehabilitative efforts, general reputation for truth, and professional ability. The hearing may be continued, as the board or administrative law judge finds necessary.

(e) The board or administrative law judge, when hearing a petition for reinstating a license or approval or modifying a penalty, may recommend the imposition of any terms and conditions deemed necessary.

(f) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any
 criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole. No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the person. The board may deny, without a hearing or argument, any petition filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of the prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to alter Sections 822 and 823.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 42.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3531.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge of a felony or of any offense that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession to which the license was issued is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this chapter. The board may order the license suspended or revoked, or shall decline to issue a license when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under
 Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing that person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 19.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Penalties [3532. - 3533.]

3532.

Any person who violates Section 3502, 3503, 3515, or 3516 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 13.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

3533.

Whenever any person has engaged in any act or practice which constitutes an offense against this chapter, the superior court of any county, on application of the board, may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining such conduct. Proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The board may commence action in the superior court under the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 43.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Diversion of Impaired Physician Assistants [3534. - 3534.10.]

3534.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the board shall seek ways and means to identify and rehabilitate physician assistants whose competency is impaired due to abuse of dangerous drugs or alcohol so that they may be treated and returned to the practice of medicine in a manner which will not endanger the public health and safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 66.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3534.1.

The board shall establish and administer a diversion program for the rehabilitation of physician assistants whose competency is impaired due to the abuse of drugs or alcohol. The board may contract with any other state agency or a private organization to perform its duties under this article. The board may establish one or more diversion evaluation committees to assist it in carrying out its duties under this article. As used in this article, “committee” means a diversion evaluation committee. A committee created under this article operates under the direction of the diversion program manager, as designated by the executive officer of the board. The program manager has the primary responsibility to review and evaluate recommendations of the
 committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 67.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3534.2.

(a) Any committee established by the board shall have at least three members. In making appointments to a committee the board shall consider the appointments of persons who are either recovering of substance abuse and have been free from abuse for at least three years immediately prior to their appointment or who are knowledgeable in the treatment and recovery of substance abuse. The board also shall consider the appointment of a physician and surgeon who is board certified in psychiatry.

(b) Appointments to a committee shall be by the affirmative vote of a majority of members appointed to the board. Each appointment shall be at the pleasure of the board for a term not to exceed
 four years. In its discretion, the board may stagger the terms of the initial members so appointed.

(c) A majority of the members of a committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Any action requires an affirmative vote of a majority of those members present at a meeting constituting at least a quorum. Each committee shall elect from its membership a chairperson and a vice chairperson. Notwithstanding Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, relating to public meetings, a committee may convene in closed session to consider matters relating to any physician assistant applying for or participating in a diversion program, and a meeting which will be convened entirely in closed session need not comply with Section 11125 of the Government Code. A committee shall only convene in closed session to the extent it is necessary to protect the privacy of an
 applicant or participant. Each member of a committee shall receive a per diem and shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 68.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3534.3.

Each committee has the following duties and responsibilities:

(a) To evaluate physician assistants who request participation in the program and to make recommendations to the program manager. In making recommendations, a committee shall consider any recommendations from professional consultants on the admission of applicants to the diversion program.

(b) To review and designate treatment facilities to which physician assistants in the diversion program may be referred, and to make recommendations to the program manager.

(c) The receipt and review of information concerning
 physician assistants participating in the program.

(d) To call meetings as necessary to consider the requests of physician assistants to participate in the diversion program, to consider reports regarding participants in the program, and to consider any other matters referred to it by the board.

(e) To consider whether each participant in the diversion program may with safety continue or resume the practice of medicine.

(f) To set forth in writing the terms and conditions of the diversion agreement that is approved by the program manager for each physician assistant participating in the program, including treatment, supervision, and monitoring requirements.

(g) To hold a general meeting at least twice a year, which shall be open and public, to evaluate
 the diversion program’s progress, to prepare reports to be submitted to the board, and to suggest proposals for changes in the diversion program.

(h) For the purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, any member of a committee shall be considered a public employee. No board or committee member, contractor, or agent thereof, shall be liable for any civil damage because of acts or omissions which may occur while acting in good faith in a program established pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 69.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3534.4.

(a) Criteria for acceptance into the diversion program shall include all of the following: 

(1) The applicant shall be licensed as a physician assistant by the board and shall be a resident of California.

(2) The applicant shall be found to abuse dangerous drugs or alcoholic beverages in a manner that may affect their ability to practice medicine safely or competently.

(3) The applicant shall have voluntarily requested admission to the program or shall be accepted into the program in accordance with terms and conditions resulting from a disciplinary action.

(4) The applicant shall agree to undertake any medical or psychiatric examination ordered to evaluate the applicant for participation in the program.

(5) The applicant shall cooperate with the program by providing medical information, disclosure authorizations, and releases of liability as may be necessary for participation in the program.

(6) The applicant shall agree in writing to cooperate with all elements of the treatment program designed for them.

(b) An applicant may be denied participation in the program if the board, the program manager, or a committee determines that the applicant will not substantially benefit from participation in the program or that
 the applicant’s participation in the program creates too great a risk to the public health, safety, or welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 20.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3534.5.

(a) A participant may be terminated from the program for any of the following reasons:

(1) The participant has successfully completed the treatment program.

(2) The participant has failed to comply with the treatment program designated for them.

(3) The participant fails to meet any of the criteria set forth in paragraph (4).

(4) It is determined that the participant has not substantially benefited from participation in the program or that their continued participation in the program creates too
 great a risk to the public health, safety, or welfare.

(b) Whenever an applicant is denied participation in the program or a participant is terminated from the program for any reason other than the successful completion of the program, and it is determined that the continued practice of medicine by that individual creates too great a risk to the public health and safety, that fact shall be reported to the executive officer of the board and all documents and information pertaining to and supporting that conclusion shall be provided to the executive officer. The matter may be referred for investigation and disciplinary action by the board.

(c) Each physician assistant who requests participation in a diversion program shall agree to cooperate with the recovery program
 designed for them. Any failure to comply with that program may result in termination of participation in the program.

(d) The board shall inform each participant in the program of the procedures followed in the program, of the rights and responsibilities of a physician assistant in the program, and the possible results of noncompliance with the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 21.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3534.6.

In addition to the criteria and causes set forth in Section 3534.4, the board may set forth in its regulations additional criteria for admission to the program or causes for termination from the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 72.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3534.7.

All board and committee records and records of proceedings and participation of a physician assistant in a program shall be confidential and are not subject to discovery or subpoena.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 73.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3534.8.

A fee may be charged for participation in the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 385, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3534.9.

If the board contracts with any other entity to carry out this section, the executive officer of the board or the program manager shall review the activities and performance of the contractor on a biennial basis. As part of this review, the board shall review files of participants in the program. However, the names of participants who entered the program voluntarily shall remain confidential, except when the review reveals misdiagnosis, case mismanagement, or noncompliance by the participant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 74.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3534.10.

Participation in a diversion program shall not be a defense to any disciplinary action which may be taken by the board. This section does not preclude the board from commencing disciplinary action against a physician assistant who is terminated unsuccessfully from the program under this section. That disciplinary action may not include as evidence any confidential information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 75.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Osteopathic Physician Assistants [3535. - 3535.]

3535.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, physicians and surgeons licensed by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California may use or employ physician assistants provided (1) each physician assistant so used or employed is a graduate of an approved program and is licensed by the board, and (2) the scope of practice of the physician assistant is the same as that which is approved by the Division of Licensing of the Medical Board of California for physicians and surgeons supervising physician assistants in the same or similar specialty.

(b) Any person who violates subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months,
 or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 76.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. International Medical Graduate Physician Assistants [3537.10. - 3537.50.]

3537.10.

(a) Subject to the other provisions of this article, the Department of Health Care Access and Information, hereafter in this article referred to as the department, shall coordinate the establishment of an international medical graduate physician assistant training program, to be conducted at an appropriate educational institution or institutions. The goal of the program shall be to place as many international medical graduate physician assistants in medically underserved areas as possible in order to provide greater access to care for the growing population of medically indigent and underserved. The method for accomplishing this goal shall be to train foreign medical graduates to become licensed as physician assistants at no cost to the
 participants in return for a commitment from the participants to serve full time in underserved areas for a four-year period.

(b) By February 1, 1994, or one month after federal funds to implement this article become available, whichever occurs later, the department shall establish a training program advisory task force. The task force shall be comprised of representatives from all of the following groups:

(1) Physician assistant program directors.

(2) Foreign medical graduates.

(3) The California Academy of Physician Assistants.

(4) Nonprofit community health center directors.

(5) Physicians.

(6) The board, at the board’s option.

The department may, instead, serve solely as a consultant to the task force.

(c) The task force shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop a recommended curriculum for the training program that shall be from 12 to 15 months in duration and shall, at a minimum, meet curriculum standards consistent with the board’s regulations. The program shall be subject to the board’s approval. By April 1, 1994, or three months after federal funds to implement this article become available, whichever occurs later, the curriculum shall be presented by the department to the Committee on
 Allied Health Education and Accreditation of the American Medical Association, or its successor organization, for approval.

(2) Develop recommended admission criteria for participation in the pilot and ongoing program.

(3) Assist in development of linkages with academic institutions for the purpose of monitoring and evaluating the pilot program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 17.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3537.15.

(a) Before establishing an ongoing international medical graduate physician assistant training program, the Department of Health Care Access and Information shall coordinate the establishment of a pilot program commencing September 1, 1994, or eight months after federal funds to implement this article become available, whichever occurs later, to test the validity and effectiveness of the recommended training curriculum developed by the task force. The task force shall, with the advice and assistance of the academic institutions offering the pilot program curriculum, and subject to their approval, select 10 international medical graduates to participate in the pilot program.

(b) After two classes have graduated from the pilot program, the task force, with the advice and assistance of the academic institutions, shall evaluate the results of the pilot program, to determine whether a permanent program should be established. The department may modify curriculum as needed and make appropriate revisions in order to ensure program integrity and compliance with established standards. Any permanent international medical graduate physician assistant training program shall commence at the beginning of the year following the completion of the evaluation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 18.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3537.20.

Any person who has satisfactorily completed the program established by this article shall be eligible for licensure by the board as a “physician assistant” if the person has complied with all of the following requirements:

(a) Has successfully completed the written examination required under Section 3517.

(b) Has successfully completed the Test of English as a Foreign Language (TOEFL).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 332, Sec. 78.   (SB 1236)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3537.25.

Both the pilot and the ongoing training program shall provide training at no cost to the participants in return for a written, enforceable agreement by the participants to, upon obtaining licensure under this article, serve a minimum of four years as a full-time physician assistant in an area of California designated by the Department of Health Care Access and Information as a medically underserved area pursuant to Section 3537.35.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 19.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3537.30.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that the goal of this program would be compromised if participants do not observe their commitments under this program to provide the required service in a medically underserved area. The goal of this program would not be met if all that it accomplished was merely to license physician assistants that served populations that are not medically underserved.

(b) Since damages would be difficult or impossible to ascertain in the event of default by the participant, this section shall set forth the extent of liquidated damages that shall be recoverable by the program in the case of default.

(c) In the case of default by a participant who has successfully completed the program and has obtained licensure under this article, the program shall collect the following damages from the participant:

(1) The total cost expended by the program for the training of the applicant, and interest thereon from the date of default.

(2) The total amount needed for the program to seek cover as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 3537.35.

(3) The costs of enforcement, including, but not limited to, the costs of collecting the liquidated damages, the costs of litigation, and attorney’s fees.

(d) The Attorney General may represent the department, or the board,
 or both in any litigation necessitated by this article, or, if the Attorney General declines, the department, or the board, or both may hire other counsel for this purpose.

(e) Funds collected pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be allocated as follows:

(1) Costs of training recovered pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall be allocated to the department to be used upon appropriation for the continuing training program pursuant to this article.

(2) Costs of seeking cover recovered pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall be deposited in the Physician Assistant Training Fund established pursuant to Section 3537.40 for the purposes of providing grants pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 3537.35.

(3) Costs of enforcement recovered pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) shall be allocated between the department, and the Attorney General, or other counsel, according to actual costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 20.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3537.35.

The Department of Health Care Access and Information shall, in addition to other duties described in this article, do all of the following:

(a) Determine those areas of the state that are medically underserved in that they have a higher percentage of medically underserved and indigent persons and would benefit from the services of additional persons licensed as physician assistants.

(b) Determine the total cost of seeking cover as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 3537.30. To determine the cost, the department shall study the market forces that are at work creating the scarcity of
 these physician assistants in these medically underserved areas, and determine the annual level of additional funding that would be required by a health facility, clinic, or other health care provider in those areas to motivate a physician assistant to serve full-time in those underserved areas. This amount shall be calculated so that when added to the prevailing rate for these services in the underserved area, would make these positions so attractive that physician assistants would be motivated to serve in those areas. This amount, which shall equal the cost to the department to place a qualified physician assistant in the underserved area, times four years shall be the total cost of seeking cover.

(c) Provide grants, as funds become available in the Physician Assistant Training Fund, to applicant health care providers that provide
 services in medically underserved areas for the purpose of funding additional full-time physician assistant positions in those areas to provide services in lieu of defaulting physician
 assistants. Participating providers shall use these grants to attract physician assistants that are from outside the area and shall demonstrate that the grant actually increases the number of physician assistants serving the underserved population. The grantee shall demonstrate that the grant did not merely shift a physician assistant from one medically underserved area to another, but rather, resulted in a net increase in the number of physician assistants serving the underserved population as a whole. Licensees under this article shall not directly or indirectly receive grants under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 21.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3537.40.

The Physician Assistant Training Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury for the purpose of receipt of funds collected pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 3537.30. The Physician Assistant Training Fund shall be available to the Department of Health Care Access and Information for the purpose of providing grants pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 3537.35, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 22.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3537.45.
